Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1161.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Board of Professional Engineering.

“Professional engineering” means any service or creative work, the adequate performance of which requires engineering education, training, and experience in the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and design acquired by engineering education and engineering experience, insofar as the service or work involves safeguarding life, health, or property. This includes consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, and design of engineering works and systems, planning the use of land, air, and water and accomplishing engineering surveys and studies, any of which embraces such services or work, either public or private, in connection with any utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, work systems, control systems, fire protection systems, communication systems, transportation systems, projects, and equipment systems of a mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, pneumatic, chemical, or thermal nature.

“Financial interest” means being:

a licensed professional engineer;

a person who deals in goods and services that are uniquely related to the practice of engineering; or

a person who has invested anything of value in a business that provides engineering services.

“Instruments of service” means project deliverables, such as reports, specifications, drawings, plans, construction documents, or engineering surveys, that have been prepared under the licensee’s responsible charge.

“Practice of professional engineering” means providing, attempting to provide, or offering to provide professional engineering services.

A professional engineer in “private practice” means a professional engineer who owns, operates, or is employed by a business entity that derives a substantial part of its income from providing professional engineering services to the public.

“Professional engineer” means a person licensed under this chapter.

“Responsible charge” means direct control and personal supervision of engineering work.

“Specialty discipline” means that area of professional engineering recognized by the Board as the area of expertise and practice for which a license is granted.

“State” includes the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, and the U.S. Virgin Islands.

“Unauthorized practice” means conduct prohibited by section 1162 of this chapter and not exempted by section 1163 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2009, No. 35

, § 13;

2013, No. 27

, § 4.

§ 1162.
Prohibition; enforcement.

No person shall engage in the practice of professional engineering in this State unless the person is licensed under or exempt from this chapter.

No person shall use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia, including “Professional Engineer,” “P.E.,” “PE,” or “P.Eng.,” indicating that the person is a professional engineer unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter.

A person found guilty of violating this section shall be subject to penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

. In addition to the power of criminal enforcement, the Attorney General, a State’s Attorney, or a prosecuting attorney from the Office of Professional Regulation may bring a civil action to restrain continuing violations of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2007, No. 29

, § 21;

2009, No. 35

, § 14;

2013, No. 27

, § 5.

§ 1163.
Exemptions.

Persons exempt. Section 1162 of this chapter does not prohibit acts constituting the practice of engineering performed as a necessary part of the duties of:

an officer or employee of the federal government;

an officer or a full-time employee of the State;

an officer or full-time employee of a municipality;

certain classes of licensed potable water supply and wastewater system designers, as designated by rule of the Secretary of Natural Resources, who design supplies or systems with a design flow of up to 1,350 gallons per day and who are licensed under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64;

an officer or employee of a corporation in interstate communications as defined in the act of Congress entitled “Communications Act of 1934” or of a telephone company under the supervision and regulation of the Public Utility Commission;

an employee or subordinate of a professional engineer, provided the engineering work is done under the responsible charge of, and verified by, the professional engineer; or

students of engineering acting under the supervision of a professional engineer.

Other professions. Section 1162 of this chapter does not prohibit acts constituting the practice of any other legally recognized profession or occupation.

Purposes exempt. Section 1162 of this chapter does not prohibit any person from performing acts constituting the practice of engineering for the purpose of:

engineering of a manufactured product;

engineering of a building that is not a public building as defined in

20 V.S.A. § 2730

;

engineering a building that contains only one, two, or three dwelling units and any outbuilding accessory to those units;

[Repealed.]

engineering of recreational trails and trail-related structures by a nonprofit organization whose trails have been recognized by the Agency of Natural Resources as part of the Vermont trails system; provided such organization purchases and maintains liability insurance in the amount required by law or under a contract with the State of Vermont, but in no event in an amount that is less than $100,000.00.

, (e)[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 76

, § 18;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 66(8);

1995, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 10, 11, eff. June 13, 2002;

2009, No. 35

, §§ 15, 41;

2013, No. 27

, § 6.